Missouri, session 2026, SB1620.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.285, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 144.285,
to read as follows:
144.285. 1. In order to permit sellers required to
collect and report the sales tax to collect the amount
required to be reported and remitted, but not to change the
requirements of reporting or remitting tax or to serve as a
levy of the tax, and in order to avoid fractions of pennies,
the director of revenue shall establish brackets, showing
the amounts of tax to be collected on sales of specified
amounts, which shall be applicable to all taxable
transactions.
2. In all instances where statements covering taxable
purchases are rendered to the taxpayer on a monthly or other
periodic basis, the amount of tax shall be determined by
applying the applicable tax rate to the taxable purchases
represented on the statement, rounded to the nearest whole
cent, or by application of the brackets established by the
director of revenue, at the option of the retail vendor.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1620 2
3. No vendor or seller shall knowingly charge or
receive from a purchaser as a sales tax any sum in excess of
the sums provided for in this section.
4. A vendor may, at his option, determine the amount
charged to and received from each purchaser by use of a
formula which applies the applicable tax rate to each
taxable purchase, rounded to the nearest whole cent. The
formula shall be uniformly and consistently applied to all
purchases similarly situated.
5. (1) For cash transactions only, a vendor may round
the total amount of sale due on a transaction to the nearest
five cents. Totals ending in $0.01, $0.02, $0.06, or $0.07
may be rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by
$0.05. Totals ending in $0.03, $0.04, $0.08, or $0.09 may
be rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by $0.05.
Rounding shall be applied only to the final total of the
transaction after all items, discounts, and taxes have been
calculated.
(2) This rounding shall not apply to transactions paid
by credit, debit, or other noncash methods. The applicable
amount of tax due in accordance with the tax brackets shall
be remitted to the department of revenue regardless of the
method of payment from the taxpayer's customer.
6. Amounts which a vendor charges to and receives from
the purchaser in accordance with this section shall not be
includable in his gross receipts if the amounts are
separately charged or stated.
[6.] 7. If sales tax for one or more local political
subdivisions is owed by a taxpayer pursuant to chapter 66,
67, 92, or 94 and that taxpayer remits less than all sales
tax due for a filing period specified in section 144.080,
the director of revenue shall deposit the tax remitted

SB 1620 3
proportionately to each taxing jurisdiction in accordance
with the percentage that each such jurisdiction's share of
the tax due for the filing period bears to the total tax due
from such taxpayer for such period. The unpaid balance due
along with penalties and interest shall be similarly
prorated among the state and all local jurisdictions for
which tax was due during the filing period for which an
underpayment occurs. The provisions of this subsection
shall apply to all returns or remittances relating to sales
made on or after January 1, 1984.
✓